Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Article 5. Coverage.

Collateral references. —

76 Am. Jur. 2d, Unemployment Compensation, §§ 43-76.

81 C.J.S., Social Security and Public Welfare, §§ 211-264.

Sec. 23.20.315.
Coverage determination.

On its own motion or on the application of an employing unit, the department shall, on the basis of facts found by it, determine whether the employing unit is an employer and whether service performed for it constitutes employment.

Within one year or a longer time which the department for good cause allows, after a determination has been made under (a) of this section, the department may reconsider its determination in the light of additional evidence and make a redetermination.

The department shall mail or deliver a notice of its determination made under (a) or (b) of this section to the last address of record of the employing unit affected. The notice must include a statement of the supporting facts found by the department.

Within 30 days after a notice of a determination has been mailed or delivered to the last address of record of an employing unit, the employing unit may apply to the department to reconsider its determination in the light of additional evidence and to issue a redetermination. The department shall, if the request is granted, mail or deliver to the last address of record of the employing unit affected a notice of the redetermination. The notice must include a statement of the supporting facts found by the department. If the department denies the request for redetermination, it shall furnish a notice of the denial of the application.

Within 30 days after a notice of a determination made under (a), (b), or (d) of this section or a denial of the application under (d) of this section has been mailed or delivered to the last address of record of an employing unit, the employing unit may appeal from the determination to the department. The department shall give the parties a reasonable opportunity for a fair hearing as provided in the case of hearings before appeal tribunals in AS

23.20.410

—

23.20.470

. The decision of the department is final unless, within 30 days after the decision is mailed or delivered to the last address of record of a party, the party initiates judicial review in accordance with AS

23.20.445

.

History.

(§ 601 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am §§ 45 — 47 ch 9 SLA 1980; am §§ 8, 9 ch 43 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Sec. 23.20.320.
Conclusiveness of determination.

A determination of the status of an employing unit by the department under AS

23.20.315

in the absence of appeal, and a final determination of the department upon an appeal, together with the record of the proceeding are admissible in a subsequent proceeding under this chapter.
If the determination is supported by substantial evidence and there is no fraud, the determination is conclusive, except as to an error of law, upon an employing unit which is a party to the proceeding.

History.

(§ 602 ch 5 ESLA 1955)

Sec. 23.20.325.
Elective coverage of excluded service.

A service performed for an employing unit which is excluded under the definition of employment, and with respect to which no payments are required under the employment security law of another state or of the federal government, is considered employment for all purposes of this chapter if the department approves a written election to that effect filed by the employing unit for which the service is performed, as of the date stated in the approval. The department may not approve an election unless it (1) includes all the service of the type specified in each establishment or place of business for which the election is made, and (2) is made for not less than two calendar years.

A service which because of an election by an employing unit under (a) of this section is employment subject to this chapter ceases to be employment subject to the chapter as of January 1 of a calendar year after the two calendar years of the election only if not later than March 15 of the year (1) the employing unit has filed with the department a written notice to that effect, or (2) the department on its own motion has given notice of termination of coverage.

History.

(§ 604 ch 5 ESLA 1955; am § 5 ch 122 SLA 1977)

Revisor’s notes. —

The contingent amendment to this section made under sec. 33, ch. 122, SLA 1977 never took effect and was repealed by sec. 82, ch. 41, SLA 2009.

Administrative Code. —

For employment security, see 8 AAC 85.

Sec. 23.20.326.
Elective coverage by political subdivisions. [Repealed, § 25 ch 122 SLA 1977.]